Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1135.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8HEMP IN COMMERCIAL ANIMAL FEEDSec.801. Definitions.802. Administration.§ 801. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commercial feed." All material or combinations of material that are distributed or intended for distribution for use as 123456789101112131415161718 feed or for mixing in feed, unless the material is specifically excluded by law. The term includes the addition of hemp seed or a substance derived from hemp seed for use as feed or for mixing in feed for a pet, specialty pet, horse or for other nonproduction animals."Industrial hemp." The plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of the plant, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3% on a dry-weight basis.§ 802. Administration.(a) Duties of department.--The department shall have the following duties:(1) To i mplement this chapter. (2) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 71 (relating to seed) and its attendant regulations, to regulate the labeling and testing of industrial hemp and industrial hemp seeds within this Commonwealth, including in commercial feed.(3) To establish, through regulation, recordkeeping requirements necessary to administer this chapter.(b) Duties of secretary.-- If the secretary determines that a Federal agency is authorized to regulate industrial hemp, the secretary shall transmit notice of the authorization to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1135PN1379 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526